Oklahoma, session 2025, SB177.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 3915 of Title 70, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


There is hereby created for the Oklahoma State Regents for


Higher Education a revolving fund to be designated the “Morrill Act


of 1890 Revolving Fund”. The fund shall be a continuing fund, not


subject to fiscal year limitations, and shall consist of all monies


received by the State Regents from legislative appropriations


provided for the purpose of providing distribution of funds to


Oklahoma’s land-grant institutions created pursuant to the Morrill


Act of 1890. All monies accruing to the credit of the fund are


hereby appropriated and shall be budgeted and expended by the


Oklahoma State Regents for Higher Education for the purpose provided

Req. No. 1420 Page 1


for in this section. Expenditures from the fund shall be made upon


warrants issued by the State Treasurer against claims filed as


prescribed by law with the Director of the Office of Management and


Enterprise Services for approval and payment.


SECTION 2. There is hereby appropriated to the Morrill Act of


1890 Revolving Fund from any monies not otherwise appropriated from


the General Revenue Fund of the State Treasury for the fiscal year


ending June 30, 2026, the sum of Four Hundred Eighteen Million Nine


Hundred Eighty-six Thousand Two Hundred Seventy-two Dollars


($418,986,272.00), for the purpose of providing an equitable


distribution of funds to Oklahoma’s 1890 land-grant institutions,


created pursuant to the Morrill Act of 1890.


SECTION 3. This act shall become effective July 1, 2025.


SECTION 4. It being immediately necessary for the preservation


of the public peace, health or safety, an emergency is hereby


declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and


be in full force from and after its passage and approval.




60-1-1420 LG 12/30/2024 1:10:35 PM











Req. No. 1420 Page 2